Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.017

Rules by commission—Successor to other boards.

(1) The commission may adopt such rules as are not inconsistent with the laws of this state as may be determined necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The commission is the successor in interest of the board of medical examiners and the medical disciplinary board. All contracts, undertakings, agreements, rules, regulations, and policies continue in full force and effect on July 1, 1994, unless otherwise repealed or rejected by this chapter or by the commission.

(2) The commission may adopt rules governing the administration of sedation and anesthesia in the offices of persons licensed under this chapter, including necessary training and equipment.

[ 2007 c 273 s 26; 2000 c 171 s 23; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 304; 1961 c 284 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2007 c 273: See RCW 70.230.900 and 70.230.901.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.